Washington statutes.
RCW 19.405.130

Stakeholder work group.

(1) The department and the commission must convene a stakeholder work group to examine the:

(a) Efficient and consistent integration of chapter 288, Laws of 2019 and transactions with carbon and electricity markets outside the state; and

(b) Compatibility of the requirements under chapter 288, Laws of 2019 relative to a linked cap-and-trade program.

(2) To assist in its examination of the issues identified in this section, as well as any other issues pertinent to its review, the work group must, at a minimum, consist of electric utilities, gas companies, the Bonneville power administration, public interest and environmental organizations, and other agencies.

(3) The department and the commission must adopt rules by June 30, 2022, defining requirements, including appropriate specification, verification, and reporting requirements, for the following: (a) Retail electric load met with market purchases and the western energy imbalance market or other centralized market administered by a market operator for the purposes of RCW 19.405.030 through 19.405.050; and (b) to address the prohibition on double counting of nonpower attributes under RCW 19.405.040(1) that could occur under other programs. With respect to purchases from the western energy imbalance market or other centralized market, the department and the commission must consult with the market operator and market participants to consider options that support the objectives of this chapter and the efficient dispatch of the generation resources dispatched by those markets.

[ 2019 c 288 s 13.]